Hawaii statutes.
[§654-6] Return of officer. The
officer shall return the order on or before the return day specified in the
order issued to the officer and state fully what the officer has done
thereunder. If the officer has taken any property the officer shall describe
the same particularly. [L Sp 1949, c 7, pt of §1; RL 1955, §244-26; HRS
§654-27; ren HRS §654-6; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next